District of Columbia statutes.
47-116

Suspension of items in Disbursing Officer’s accounts.

When differences arise in the examination of the accounts of the Disbursing Officer of the District of Columbia, calling for the suspension of any item in said accounts, it shall be the duty of the General Accounting Office to notify the Auditor of the District of Columbia in connection with the Disbursing Officer of the District of Columbia of the grounds of such objections resulting in said suspensions, in order that said Auditor in connection with said Disbursing Officer may by explanation if possible remove said grounds of suspension.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 592, ch. 1352
June 10, 1921, 42 Stat. 24, ch. 18, § 304
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-116.
1973 Ed., § 47-119.

Editor's Notes

Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.

[Reserved].